Nevada, session 83, AB437-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 629 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
If a person requests that a provider of health care fill out a
form for a certification required by an employer pursuant to 29
U.S.C. § 2613, the provider of health care shall not charge the
person:
1. Any fee or charge to fill out the form if the provider of
health care has examined, treated or otherwise provided health
care services to the person who is the subject of the certification
within the 3 years immediately preceding the date on which the
request to fill out the form is made.
2. More than $25 to fill out the form if the provider of health
care has not examined, treated or otherwise provided health care
services to the person who is the subject of the certification within
the 3 years immediately preceding the date on which the request to
fill out the form is made.
H
-
*AB437_R1*